Idaho, session 2026, S1387.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Historical Society the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027:
FOR:
Operating Expenditures $450,000
Capital Outlay 36,300
TOTAL $486,300
SECTION 2. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Idaho State Historical Society any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the Idaho State Historical Society
from the General Fund for fiscal year 2026, to be used for nonrecurring ex-
penditures related to moving costs for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropria-
tion amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Ser-
vices Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.